Missouri, session 2026, SB1271.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.995, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 160.995,
to read as follows:
160.995. 1. Before July 1, [2022] 2027, the local
board of education of each school district and the governing
board of each charter school shall adopt a written policy
that requires the administration of each public school
building within the district or the charter school, as
applicable, to provide accommodations to lactating
employees, teachers, and students to express breast milk,
breast-feed a child, or address other needs relating to
breast-feeding. The policy shall include provisions that
require the district or charter school to provide a minimum
of three opportunities during a school day, at intervals
agreed upon by the district or charter school and the
individual, to accommodate an employee's, teacher's, or
student's need to express breast milk or breast-feed a
child. The policy shall include provisions that require
such accommodations to be available to each lactating
employee, teacher, or student for at least one year
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1271 2
following the birth of the employee's, teacher's, or
student's child, and that permit such accommodations to be
available for longer than one year as determined by each
local school board or charter school governing board.
2. District and charter school policies shall require
each school building to contain suitable accommodation in
the form of a private and secure room, other than a
restroom, for the exclusive use of women and lactating
students to express breast milk or breast-feed a child.
Such accommodation shall be located in close proximity to a
sink with running water and a refrigerator for breast milk
storage and have, at a minimum, the following features:
(1) Ventilation and a door that may be locked for
privacy;
(2) A work surface and a chair; and
(3) Conveniently placed electrical outlets.
3. A public school or charter school shall:
(1) Ensure that a lactating student shall be provided
a reasonable amount of time to accommodate the need to
express breast milk; and
(2) Provide that a student shall not incur an academic
penalty as a result of the use, during the school day, of
the accommodations provided pursuant to this section.
4. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall develop a model policy that satisfies the
requirements of subsections 1 [and 2] to 3 of this section
before January 1, [2022] 2027.
[4.] 5. The department of elementary and secondary
education may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations
for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion
of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section

SB 1271 3
shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536
are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2021, shall be invalid and void.
✓